Massachusetts, session 194th, S1435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 53E¾ of chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2, 3 and 4, 13, 19, 40, 48, 50, 64, 67,
79, 88, 89, 92, 97, 116, and 139 each time they appear, the words “city or town” and inserting in
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
city, town, or county
SECTION 2. Section 53E¾ of chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 8 and 9 the words “or town council”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
town council or county legislative body
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 53E¾ of chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 69 and 70, the words “accountant in
towns having a town accountant” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
or county accountant in towns or counties having such an office
of 2